North Carolina statutes. Chapter 97. Workers’ Compensation Act.
Article 1. Workers’ Compensation Act.
§ 97-10.2.
Rights under Article not affected by liability of third party; rights and remedies against third parties.

The right to compensation and other benefits under this Article for disability, disfigurement, or death shall not be affected by the fact that the injury or death was caused under circumstances creating a liability in some person other than the employer to pay damages therefor, such person hereinafter being referred to as the “third party.” The respective rights and interests of the employee-beneficiary under this Article, the employer, and the employer’s insurance carrier, if any, in respect of the common-law cause of action against such third party and the damages recovered shall be as set forth in this section.

The employee, or his personal representative if he be dead, shall have the exclusive right to proceed to enforce the liability of the third party by appropriate proceedings if such proceedings are instituted not later than 12 months after the date of injury or death, whichever is later. During said 12-month period, and at any time thereafter if summons is issued against the third party during said 12-month period, the employee or his personal representative shall have the right to settle with the third party and to give a valid and complete release of all claims to the third party by reason of such injury or death, subject to the provisions of (h) below.

If settlement is not made and summons is not issued within said 12-month period, and if employer shall have filed with the Industrial Commission a written admission of liability for the benefits provided by this Chapter, then either the employee or the employer shall have the right to proceed to enforce the liability of the third party by appropriate proceedings; either shall have the right to settle with the third party and to give a valid and complete release of all claims to the third party by reason of such injury or death, subject to the provisions of (h) below. Provided that 60 days before the expiration of the period fixed by the applicable statute of limitations if neither the employee nor the employer shall have settled with or instituted proceedings against the third party, all such rights shall revert to the employee or his personal representative.

The person in whom the right to bring such proceeding or make settlement is vested shall, during the continuation thereof, also have the exclusive right to make settlement with the third party and the release of the person having the right shall fully acquit and discharge the third party except as provided by (h) below. A proceeding so instituted by the person having the right shall be brought in the name of the employee or his personal representative and the employer or the insurance carrier shall not be a necessary or proper party thereto. If the employee or his personal representative shall refuse to cooperate with the employer by being the party plaintiff, then the action shall be brought in the name of the employer and the employee or his personal representative shall be made a party plaintiff or party defendant by order of court.

The amount of compensation and other benefits paid or payable on account of such injury or death shall be admissible in evidence in any proceeding against the third party. In the event that said amount of compensation and other benefits is introduced in such a proceeding the court shall instruct the jury that said amount will be deducted by the court from any amount of damages awarded to the plaintiff. If the third party defending such proceeding, by answer duly served on the employer, sufficiently alleges that actionable negligence of the employer joined and concurred with the negligence of the third party in producing the injury or death, then an issue shall be submitted to the jury in such case as to whether actionable negligence of employer joined and concurred with the negligence of the third party in producing the injury or death. The employer shall have the right to appear, to be represented, to introduce evidence, to cross-examine adverse witnesses, and to argue to the jury as to this issue as fully as though he were a party although not named or joined as a party to the proceeding. Such issue shall be the last of the issues submitted to the jury. If the verdict shall be that actionable negligence of the employer did join and concur with that of the third party in producing the injury or death, then the court shall reduce the damages awarded by the jury against the third party by the amount which the employer would otherwise be entitled to receive therefrom by way of subrogation hereunder and the entire amount recovered, after such reduction, shall belong to the employee or his personal representative free of any claim by the employer and the third party shall have no further right by way of contribution or otherwise against the employer, except any right which may exist by reason of an express contract of indemnity between the employer and the third party, which was entered into prior to the injury to the employee. In the event that the court becomes aware that there is an express contract of indemnity between the employer and the third party the court may in the interest of justice exclude the employer from the trial of the claim against the third party and may meet the issue of the actionable negligence of the employer to the jury in a separate hearing.

If the employer has filed a written admission of liability for benefits under this Chapter with, or if an award final in nature in favor of the employee has been entered by the Industrial Commission, then any amount obtained by any person by settlement with, judgment against, or otherwise from the third party by reason of such injury or death shall be disbursed by order of the Industrial Commission for the following purposes and in the following order of priority:

First to the payment of actual court costs taxed by judgment and/or reasonable expenses incurred by the employee in the litigation of the third-party claim.

Second to the payment of the fee of the attorney representing the person making settlement or obtaining judgment, and except for the fee on the subrogation interest of the employer such fee shall not be subject to the provisions of

G.S. 97-90

but shall not exceed one third of the amount obtained or recovered of the third party.

Third to the reimbursement of the employer for all benefits by way of compensation or medical compensation expense paid or to be paid by the employer under award of the Industrial Commission.

Fourth to the payment of any amount remaining to the employee or his personal representative.

The attorney fee paid under (f)(1) shall be paid by the employee and the employer in direct proportion to the amount each shall receive under (f)(1)c and (f)(1)d hereof and shall be deducted from such payments when distribution is made.

The insurance carrier affording coverage to the employer under this Chapter shall be subrogated to all rights and liabilities of the employer hereunder but this shall not be construed as conferring any other or further rights upon such insurance carrier than those herein conferred upon the employer, anything in the policy of insurance to the contrary notwithstanding.

In any proceeding against or settlement with the third party, every party to the claim for compensation shall have a lien to the extent of his interest under (f) hereof upon any payment made by the third party by reason of such injury or death, whether paid in settlement, in satisfaction of judgment, as consideration for covenant not to sue, or otherwise and such lien may be enforced against any person receiving such funds. Neither the employee or his personal representative nor the employer shall make any settlement with or accept any payment from the third party without the written consent of the other and no release to or agreement with the third party shall be valid or enforceable for any purpose unless both employer and employee or his personal representative join therein; provided, that this sentence shall not apply:

If the employer is made whole for all benefits paid or to be paid by him under this Chapter less attorney’s fees as provided by (f)(1) and (2) hereof and the release to or agreement with the third party is executed by the employee; or

If either party follows the provisions of subsection (j) of this section.

Institution of proceedings against or settlement with the third party, or acceptance of benefits under this Chapter, shall not in any way or manner affect any other remedy which any party to the claim for compensation may have except as otherwise specifically provided in this Chapter, and the exercise of one remedy shall not in any way or manner be held to constitute an election of remedies so as to bar the other.

Notwithstanding any other subsection in this section, in the event that a judgment is obtained by the employee in an action against a third party, or in the event that a settlement has been agreed upon by the employee and the third party, either party may apply to the resident superior court judge of the county in which the cause of action arose or where the injured employee resides, or to a presiding judge of either district, to determine the subrogation amount. After notice to the employer and the insurance carrier, after an opportunity to be heard by all interested parties, and with or without the consent of the employer, the judge shall determine, in his discretion, the amount, if any, of the employer’s lien, whether based on accrued or prospective workers’ compensation benefits, and the amount of cost of the third-party litigation to be shared between the employee and employer. The judge shall consider the anticipated amount of prospective compensation the employer or workers’ compensation carrier is likely to pay to the employee in the future, the net recovery to plaintiff, the likelihood of the plaintiff prevailing at trial or on appeal, the need for finality in the litigation, and any other factors the court deems just and reasonable, in determining the appropriate amount of the employer’s lien. If the matter is pending in the federal district court such determination may be made by a federal district court judge of that division.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 11; 1933, c. 449, s. 1; 1943, c. 622; 1959, c. 1324; 1963, c. 450, s. 1; 1971, c. 171, s. 1; 1979, c. 865, s. 1; 1983, c. 645, ss. 1, 2; 1991, c. 408, s. 1; c. 703, s. 2; 1999-194, s. 1; 2004-199, s. 13(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-199, s. 13(b), effective August 17, 2004, substituted “arose or where the injured employee resides, or to a presiding judge of either district” for “arose, where the injured employee resides or the presiding judge before whom the cause of action is pending” in subsection (j).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Settlement with a Third Party,” see 8 N.C.L. Rev. 424 (1930).

For survey of 1976 case law on workers’ compensation, see 55 N.C.L. Rev. 1116 (1977).

For survey of 1977 workers’ compensation law, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 1166 (1978).

For article, “Third-Party Action Over Against Workers’ Compensation Employer,” see 1982 Duke L.J. 483.

For note, “Pleasant v. Johnson: The North Carolina Supreme Court Enters the Twilight Zone — Is a Co-employee Liable in Tort for Willful, Reckless, and Wanton Conduct?,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 688 (1986).

For note, “A New Exception to the Exclusivity Provision of the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act — Woodson v. Rowland,” see 14 Campbell L. Rev. 261 (1992).

For a survey of 1996 developments in the law regarding prisoner rights, see 75 N.C.L. Rev. 2428 (1997).

§ 97-10.3.
Minors illegally employed.

In any case where an employer and employee are subject to the provisions of this Chapter, any injury to a minor while employed contrary to the laws of this State shall be compensable under this Chapter as if said minor were an adult, subject to the other provisions of this Chapter.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 11; 1933, c. 449, s. 1; 1943, c. 622; 1959, c. 1324.

§ 97-11.
Employer not relieved of statutory duty.

Nothing in this Article shall be construed to relieve any employer or employee from penalty for failure or neglect to perform any statutory duty.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 12.

§ 97-12.
Use of intoxicant or controlled substance; willful neglect; willful disobedience of statutory duty, safety regulation or rule.

No compensation shall be payable if the injury or death to the employee was proximately caused by:

His intoxication, provided the intoxicant was not supplied by the employer or his agent in a supervisory capacity to the employee; or

His being under the influence of any controlled substance listed in the North Carolina Controlled Substances Act, G.S. 90-86, et seq., where such controlled substance was not by prescription by a practitioner; or

His willful intention to injure or kill himself or another.

When the injury or death is caused by the willful failure of the employer to comply with any statutory requirement or any lawful order of the Commission, compensation shall be increased ten percent (10%). When the injury or death is caused by the willful failure of the employee to use a safety appliance or perform a statutory duty or by the willful breach of any rule or regulation adopted by the employer and approved by the Commission and brought to the knowledge of the employee prior to the injury compensation shall be reduced ten percent (10%). The burden of proof shall be upon him who claims an exemption or forfeiture under this section.

“Intoxication” and “under the influence” shall mean that the employee shall have consumed a sufficient quantity of intoxicating beverage or controlled substance to cause the employee to lose the normal control of his or her bodily or mental faculties, or both, to such an extent that there was an appreciable impairment of either or both of these faculties at the time of the injury.

A result consistent with “intoxication” or being “under the influence” from a blood or other medical test conducted in a manner generally acceptable to the scientific community and consistent with applicable State and federal law, if any, shall create a rebuttable presumption of impairment from the use of alcohol or a controlled substance.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 13; 1975, c. 740; 2005-448, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-448, s. 2, effective October 1, 2005, added the last two paragraphs.

Legal Periodicals.

As to effect of breach by statute upon willful misconduct, see 8 N.C.L. Rev. 326 (1930).

For note on the range of compensable consequences of a work-related injury, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 583 (1971).

For survey of 1976 case law on workers’ compensation, see 55 N.C.L. Rev. 1116 (1977).

For survey of 1977 workers’ compensation law, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 1166 (1978).

For survey of 1982 law on workers’ compensation, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1243 (1983).

§ 97-12.1.
Willful misrepresentation in applying for employment.

No compensation shall be allowed under this Article for injury by accident or occupational disease if the employer proves that (i) at the time of hire or in the course of entering into employment, (ii) at the time of receiving notice of the removal of conditions from a conditional offer of employment, or (iii) during the course of a post-offer medical examination:

The employee knowingly and willfully made a false representation as to the employee’s physical condition;

The employer relied upon one or more false representations by the employee, and the reliance was a substantial factor in the employer’s decision to hire the employee; and

There was a causal connection between false representation by the employee and the injury or occupational disease.

History.

2011-287, s. 3.

§ 97-13.
Exceptions from provisions of Article. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Employees of Certain Railroads. — This Article shall not apply to railroads or railroad employees nor in any way repeal, amend, alter or affect Article 8 of Chapter 60 or any section thereof relating to the liability of railroads for injuries to employees, nor upon the trial of any action in tort for injuries not coming under the provisions of this Article, shall any provision herein be placed in evidence or be permitted to be argued to the jury. Provided, however, that the foregoing exemption to railroads and railroad employees shall not apply to employees of a State-owned railroad company, as defined in G.S. 124-11, or to electric street railroads or employees thereof; and this Article shall apply to electric street railroads and employees thereof and to this extent the provisions of Article 8 of Chapter 60 are hereby amended.

Casual Employment, Domestic Servants, Farm Laborers, Federal Government, Employer of Less than Three Employees. — This Article shall not apply to casual employees, farm laborers when fewer than 10 full-time nonseasonal farm laborers are regularly employed by the same employer, federal government employees in North Carolina, and domestic servants, nor to employees of such persons, nor to any person, firm or private corporation that has regularly in service less than three employees in the same business within this State, except that any employer without regard to number of employees, including an employer of domestic servants, farm laborers, or one who previously had exempted himself, who has purchased workers’ compensation insurance to cover his compensation liability shall be conclusively presumed during life of the policy to have accepted the provisions of this Article from the effective date of said policy and his employees shall be so bound unless waived as provided in this Article; provided however, that this Article shall apply to all employers of one or more employees who are employed in activities which involve the use or presence of radiation.

Prisoners. — This Article shall not apply to prisoners being worked by the State or any subdivision thereof, except to the following extent: Whenever any prisoner assigned to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall suffer accidental injury or accidental death arising out of and in the course of the employment to which he had been assigned, if there be death or if the results of such injury continue until after the date of the lawful discharge of such prisoner to such an extent as to amount to a disability as defined in this Article, then such discharged prisoner or the dependents or next of kin of such discharged prisoner may have the benefit of this Article by applying to the Industrial Commission as any other employee; provided, such application is made within 12 months from the date of the discharge; and provided further that the maximum compensation to any prisoner or to the dependents or next of kin of any deceased prisoner shall not exceed thirty dollars ($30.00) per week and the period of compensation shall relate to the date of his discharge rather than the date of the accident. If any person who has been awarded compensation under the provisions of this subsection shall be recommitted to prison upon conviction of an offense committed subsequent to the award, such compensation shall immediately cease. Any awards made under the terms of this subsection shall be paid by the Department of Public Safety from the funds available for the operation of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. The provisions of

G.S. 97-10.1

and 97-10.2 shall apply to prisoners and discharged prisoners entitled to compensation under this subsection and to the State in the same manner as said section applies to employees and employers.

(c1)

Certain Inmates. —

Notwithstanding the thirty dollars ($30.00) per week limit in subsection (c) of this section, the average weekly wage of inmates employed pursuant to the Prison Industry Enhancement Program shall be calculated pursuant to

G.S. 97-2(5)

.

Sellers of Agricultural Products. — This Article shall not apply to persons, firms or corporations engaged in selling agricultural products for the producers thereof on commission or for other compensation, paid by the producers, provided the product is prepared for sale by the producer.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 14; 1933, c. 401; 1935, c. 150; 1941, c. 295; 1943, c. 543; 1945, c. 766; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; c. 809; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1971, c. 284, s. 2; c. 1176; 1975, c. 718, s. 3; 1979, c. 247, s. 1; c. 714, s. 2; 1981, c. 378, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1042, s. 2; 1987, c. 729, s. 3; 2000-146, s. 11; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 34; 2017-186, s. 2(tttt); 2017-212, s. 5.1.

Local Modification.

Mecklenburg: 1933, c. 401.

Cross References.

For definitions under this article, see

G.S. 97-2

.

§ 97-13.
Exceptions from provisions of Article. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Employees of Certain Railroads. — This Article shall not apply to railroads or railroad employees nor in any way repeal, amend, alter or affect Article 8 of Chapter 60 or any section thereof relating to the liability of railroads for injuries to employees, nor upon the trial of any action in tort for injuries not coming under the provisions of this Article, shall any provision herein be placed in evidence or be permitted to be argued to the jury. Provided, however, that the foregoing exemption to railroads and railroad employees shall not apply to employees of a State-owned railroad company, as defined in G.S. 124-11, or to electric street railroads or employees thereof; and this Article shall apply to electric street railroads and employees thereof and to this extent the provisions of Article 8 of Chapter 60 are hereby amended.

Casual Employment, Domestic Servants, Farm Laborers, Federal Government, Employer of Less than Three Employees. — This Article shall not apply to casual employees, farm laborers when fewer than 10 full-time nonseasonal farm laborers are regularly employed by the same employer, federal government employees in North Carolina, and domestic servants, nor to employees of such persons, nor to any person, firm or private corporation that has regularly in service less than three employees in the same business within this State, except that any employer without regard to number of employees, including an employer of domestic servants, farm laborers, or one who previously had exempted himself, who has purchased workers’ compensation insurance to cover his compensation liability shall be conclusively presumed during life of the policy to have accepted the provisions of this Article from the effective date of said policy and his employees shall be so bound unless waived as provided in this Article; provided however, that this Article shall apply to all employers of one or more employees who are employed in activities which involve the use or presence of radiation.

Prisoners. — This Article shall not apply to prisoners being worked by the State or any subdivision thereof, except to the following extent: Whenever any prisoner assigned to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall suffer accidental injury or accidental death arising out of and in the course of the employment to which he had been assigned, if there be death or if the results of such injury continue until after the date of the lawful discharge of such prisoner to such an extent as to amount to a disability as defined in this Article, then such discharged prisoner or the dependents or next of kin of such discharged prisoner may have the benefit of this Article by applying to the Industrial Commission as any other employee; provided, such application is made within 12 months from the date of the discharge; and provided further that the maximum compensation to any prisoner or to the dependents or next of kin of any deceased prisoner shall not exceed thirty dollars ($30.00) per week and the period of compensation shall relate to the date of his discharge rather than the date of the accident. If any person who has been awarded compensation under the provisions of this subsection shall be recommitted to prison upon conviction of an offense committed subsequent to the award, such compensation shall immediately cease. Any awards made under the terms of this subsection shall be paid by the Department of Adult Correction from the funds available for the operation of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. The provisions of

G.S. 97-10.1

and 97-10.2 shall apply to prisoners and discharged prisoners entitled to compensation under this subsection and to the State in the same manner as said section applies to employees and employers.

(c1)

Certain Inmates. —

Notwithstanding the thirty dollars ($30.00) per week limit in subsection (c) of this section, the average weekly wage of inmates employed pursuant to the Prison Industry Enhancement Program shall be calculated pursuant to

G.S. 97-2(5)

.

Sellers of Agricultural Products. — This Article shall not apply to persons, firms or corporations engaged in selling agricultural products for the producers thereof on commission or for other compensation, paid by the producers, provided the product is prepared for sale by the producer.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 14; 1933, c. 401; 1935, c. 150; 1941, c. 295; 1943, c. 543; 1945, c. 766; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; c. 809; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1971, c. 284, s. 2; c. 1176; 1975, c. 718, s. 3; 1979, c. 247, s. 1; c. 714, s. 2; 1981, c. 378, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1042, s. 2; 1987, c. 729, s. 3; 2000-146, s. 11; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 34; 2017-186, s. 2(tttt); 2017-212, s. 5.1; 2021-180, ss. 19C.9(n), (p).

Local Modification.

Mecklenburg: 1933, c. 401.

Cross References.

For definitions under this article, see

G.S. 97-2

.

§§ 97-14 through 97-16.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1291, ss. 7-9.

§ 97-17.
Settlements allowed in accordance with Article.

This article does not prevent settlements made by and between the employee and employer so long as the amount of compensation and the time and manner of payment are in accordance with the provisions of this Article. A copy of a settlement agreement shall be filed by the employer with and approved by the Commission. No party to any agreement for compensation approved by the Commission shall deny the truth of the matters contained in the settlement agreement, unless the party is able to show to the satisfaction of the Commission that there has been error due to fraud, misrepresentation, undue influence or mutual mistake, in which event the Commission may set aside the agreement. Except as provided in this subsection, the decision of the Commission to approve a settlement agreement is final and is not subject to review or collateral attack.

The Commission shall not approve a settlement agreement under this section, unless all of the following conditions are satisfied:

The settlement agreement is deemed by the Commission to be fair and just, and that the interests of all of the parties and of any person, including a health benefit plan that paid medical expenses of the employee have been considered.

The settlement agreement contains a list of all of the known medical expenses of the employee related to the injury to the date of the settlement agreement, including medical expenses that the employer or carrier disputes, and a list of medical expenses, if any, that will be paid by the employer under the settlement agreement.

The settlement agreement contains a finding that the positions of all of the parties to the agreement are reasonable as to the payment of medical expenses.

It is not necessary, however, to satisfy the condition in subdivision (2) of this subsection when in the settlement agreement the employer agrees to pay all medical expenses of the employee related to the injury to the date of the settlement agreement.

In determining whether the positions of all of the parties to the agreement are reasonable as to the payment of medical expenses under subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section, the Commission shall consider all of the following:

Whether the employer admitted or reasonably denied the employee’s claim for compensation.

The amount of all of the known medical expenses of the employee related to the injury to the date of the settlement agreement, including medical expenses that the employer or carrier disputes.

The need for finality in the litigation.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the application of

G.S. 44-49

and

G.S. 44-50

to funds in compensation for settlement under this section.

Nothing in this section prevents the parties from reaching a separate contemporaneous agreement resolving issues not covered by this Article.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 18; 1963, c. 436; 2001-216, s. 2; 2001-487, s. 102(b); 2005-448, s. 3; 2011-287, s. 4.